vi: Thành phần nguyên liệu nền của rượu Vodka: Lúa mạch; Ngô; Nho; Ngũ cốc hỗn hợp; Khoai tây; Gạo; Lúa mạch đen; Mía; Lúa mì; Khác
hr-HR: Baza votke: Ječam; Kukuruz; Grožđe; Miješane žitarice; Krumpir; Riža; Raž; Šećerna trska; Pšenica; Ostalo
sk-SK: Zložka na báze vodky: Jačmeň; Kukurica; Hrozno; Zmiešané obilniny; Zemiaky; Ryža; Raž; Cukrová trstina; Pšenica; Iné
sv: Basingrediens för vodka: Korn; Majs; Vindruvor; Blandade spannmål; Potatis; Ris; Råg; Sockerrör; Vete; Övrigt
zh-TW: 伏特加基底成分: 大麥; 玉米; 葡萄; 混合穀物; 馬鈴薯; 米; 黑麥; 甘蔗; 小麥; 其他
nl: Basisingrediënt wodka: Gerst; Maïs; Druiven; Gemengde granen; Aardappel; Rijst; Rogge; Suikerriet; Tarwe; Overige
da: Basisingrediens i vodka: Byg; Majs; Druer; Blandet korn; Kartoffel; Ris; Rug; Sukkerrør; Hvede; Andet
it: Ingrediente base della vodka: Orzo; Mais; Uva; Cereali misti; Patata; Riso; Segale; Canna da zucchero; Grano; Altro
pl: Składnik bazowy wódki: Jęczmień; Kukurydza; Winogrona; Mieszanka zbóż; Ziemniak; Ryż; Żyto; Trzcina cukrowa; Pszenica; Inne
de: Grundzutat des Wodkas: Gerste; Mais; Trauben; Gemischtes Getreide; Kartoffel; Reis; Roggen; Zuckerrohr; Weizen; Sonstiges
ko: 보드카 베이스 원료 : 보리; 옥수수; 포도; 혼합 곡물; 감자; 쌀; 호밀; 사탕수수; 밀; 기타
th: ส่วนผสมหลักของวอดก้า: ข้าวบาร์เลย์; ข้าวโพด; องุ่น; ธัญพืชรวม; มันฝรั่ง; ข้าว; ข้าวไรย์; อ้อย; ข้าวสาลี; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Vodkos pagrindo ingredientas: Miežiai; Kukurūzai; Vynuogės; Įvairūs grūdai; Bulvės; Ryžiai; Rugiai; Cukranendrės; Kviečiai; Kita
bg-BG: Основна съставка на водката: Ечемик; Царевица; Грозде; Смесени зърнени култури; Картоф; Ориз; Ръж; Захарна тръстика; Пшеница; Друго
fi: Vodkan perusainesosa: Ohra; Maissi; Viinirypäleet; Sekavilja; Peruna; Riisi; Ruis; Sokeriruoko; Vehnä; Muu
fr: Ingrédient de base de la vodka: Orge; Maïs; Raisin; Mélange de céréales; Pomme de terre; Riz; Seigle; Canne à sucre; Blé; Autre
sl-SI: Osnovna sestavina vodke: Ječmen; Koruza; Grozdje; Mešana žita; Krompir; Riž; Rž; Sladkorni trs; Pšenica; Drugo
pt-BR: Ingrediente base da vodca: Cevada; Milho; Uvas; Grãos mistos; Batata; Arroz; Centeio; Cana-de-açúcar; Trigo; Outro
ja: ウォッカベース成分: 大麦; コーン; ブドウ; 雑穀; ジャガイモ; 米; ライ麦; サトウキビ; 小麦; その他
ro-RO: Ingredient de bază pentru vodcă: Orz; Porumb; Struguri; Amestec de cereale; Cartofi; Orez; Secară; Trestie de zahăr; Grâu; Altele
pt-PT: Ingrediente base da vodka: Cevada; Milho; Uvas; Grãos mistos; Batata; Arroz; Centeio; Cana-de-açúcar; Trigo; Outro
en: Vodka base ingredient: Barley; Corn; Grapes; Mixed grains; Potato; Rice; Rye; Sugarcane; Wheat; Other
es: Ingrediente base del vodka: Cebada; Maíz; Uvas; Granos mixtos; Papa; Arroz; Centeno; Caña de azúcar; Trigo; Otro
hu: Vodka alap összetevője: Árpa; Kukorica; Szőlő; Vegyes gabona; Burgonya; Rizs; Rozs; Cukornád; Búza; Egyéb
el: Βασικό συστατικό βότκας: Κριθάρι; Καλαμπόκι; Σταφύλια; Ανάμεικτα σιτηρά; Πατάτα; Ρύζι; Σίκαλη; Ζαχαροκάλαμο; Σιτάρι; Άλλο
nb: Basisingrediens i vodka: Bygg; Mais; Druer; Blandet korn; Potet; Ris; Rug; Sukkerrør; Hvete; Annet
cs: Základní přísada vodky: Ječmen; Kukuřice; Hrozny; Smíšené obiloviny; Brambory; Rýže; Žito; Cukrová třtina; Pšenice; Jiné
tr: Votka baz bileşeni: Arpa; Mısır; Üzüm; Karışık tahıllar; Patates; Pirinç; Çavdar; Şeker kamışı; Buğday; Diğer
ru: Основа водки: Ячмень; Кукуруза; Виноград; Зерновая смесь; Картофель; Рис; Рожь; Сахарный тростник; Пшеница; Другое
zh-CN: 伏特加基底原料: 大麦; 玉米; 葡萄; 混合谷物; 土豆; 大米; 黑麦; 甘蔗; 小麦; 其他